Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall establish  a doula program for
pregnant and postpartum adults in custody at the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility.
Enrolled House Bill 2535 (HB 2535-A) Page 1
(2) The doula program must provide doula services to  adults in custody who are pregnant
or who have  given birth in the last year. Persons providing doula services must be granted
appropriate facility access, must be allowed to attend and provide assistance during labor and
childbirth when feasible and must have  access to the adult in custody’s relevant health in-
formation if the adult in custody authorizes disclosure.
(3) The department shall have one employee serve as the contact and coordinator for  all
persons providing doula services at the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility.
(4) Doula services are services provided  by a trained doula that are designed to provide
physical, emotional or informational support to a pregnant adult before, during and  after
delivery of a child. Doula services provided to adults in custody at  the Coffee Creek
Correctional Facility must include, but are not limited to:
(a) Prenatal, postpartum and parent education;
(b) Development of a trauma-informed and  culturally specific birth plan for each preg-
nant adult in custody;
(c) In-person attendance by a doula at routine prenatal visits, ultrasound  imaging ap-
pointments and lab testing appointments;
(d) Consultation and participation in the determination of the stages and progression of
labor when determining the transport to a hospital or other delivery facility;
(e) Culturally specific  and trauma-informed support and assistance during labor and
childbirth and the postpartum period;
(f) Assistance with breastfeeding or milk expression after childbirth  if requested by the
adult in custody;
(g) Enrollment of the adult in  custody in the breastfeeding program and in a breastmilk
transportation program for delivery of the mother’s milk to  the infant, including facilitating
access to a breast pump and pumping supplies; and
(h) Support in the event an adult in custody has been  or will become separated from her
child.
(5) Services provided under this section  may not supplant health care services routinely
provided to adults in custody.
(6) For  each adult in custody who is being provided transport to a hospital for labor and
delivery, the department transport officer shall have a checklist of the policies to  be adhered
to during the transport and a copy of the birth plan.
(7) If it is not feasible for a doula  to attend and provide assistance during the labor and
delivery of an adult in custody, the  reason for the lack of feasibility for a doula’s attendance
must be documented in the adult in custody’s medical file and an alternative birth  plan must
be developed, implemented and documented in the medical file.
(8) The  department may partner with community professionals who have been creden-
tialed in their line of service, trained  or otherwise have specific expertise to provide the
doula services described in this section.
(9) As used in  this section “postpartum period” means a period of one year following
childbirth.
SECTION 2.
(1) An adult in custody may not  be restrained mechanically during labor,
childbirth or postpartum recovery in a hospital unless:
(a) The  mechanical restraints are reasonably necessary, as determined by a supervising
officer, for the safety and security of  the adult in custody, correctional staff, other persons
or the public; and
(b) The attending physician determines that use of the mechanical restraints does not
present a medical risk to the adult in custody.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the use of a mechanical restraint:
(a) May not interfere with the adult in custody’s ability to hold the infant, nurse  the in-
fant, establish a milk supply, obtain  lactation support or receive other postpartum recovery
care from hospital staff.
Enrolled House Bill 2535 (HB 2535-A) Page 2
(b) Must be in the least restrictive manner possible.
SECTION 3.
After giving birth to  a child at a hospital, an adult in custody must be sub-
ject to medically appropriate procedures constituting the least restrictive means to  ensure
safe transport to and arrival at a Department of Corrections facility.
SECTION 4. (1) Prior to implementing the doula program established under section 1  of
this 2023 Act, the Department  of Corrections shall develop procedures, informed by feedback
from stakeholders and received at the listening sessions described in subsection (2)  of this
section, to:
(a) Document compliance or noncompliance with the checklist of policies under  section
1 (6) of this 2023 Act and ensure that the documentation is stored in the adult in custody’s
file.
(b) Document any use of mechanical restraints under  section 2 of this 2023 Act, including
when and why the restraints were used and ensure that the  documentation is stored in the
adult in custody’s file.
(c) Minimize the severity and invasiveness of the transport and arrival procedures  de-
scribed in section 3 of this 2023 Act, including strip searches and body cavity searches.
(2) The department shall participate in at least  two listening sessions with individuals
who gave birth while in the custody of the department.
(3)(a) The department shall provide a report on the actions taken to implement  the doula
program to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary in
the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than March 15, 2024.
(b) The report must examine the procedures described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act become operative on June 1, 2024.
(2) The Department of Corrections may take any action  before the operative date speci-
fied in subsection (1) of this section to enable the department to exercise, on  and after the
operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department by sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2535 (HB 2535-A) Page 3
Passed by House March 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2535 (HB 2535-A) Page 4